Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 4. Modification or Vacation after Term

Cross references. —

As to vacating satisfaction in connection with sale of wrong property under execution, see §

1-17-333

.

As to motion to vacate or modify injunction, see §§

1-28-110

and

1-28-111

.

As to court vacating award under Uniform Arbitration Act, see §

1-36-114

.

As to motions to alter or amend judgment, see Rule 59, W.R.C.P.

As to stay of proceedings to enforce a judgment generally, see Rule 62, W.R.C.P.

Article inapplicable to child custody, child support or alimony
decrees. —

The general restrictions on a court for modification or vacation of judgments after the term in which such are made do not apply to decrees concerning child custody, child support or alimony, but do apply to decrees concerning property divisions. Paul v. Paul, 631 P.2d 1060,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 364

(Wyo. 1981).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d Judgments §§ 740 to 872; 58 Am. Jur. 2d New Trial § 1 et seq.

Vacation or setting aside of judgment as to 1 or more of multiple parties against whom rendered as requiring its vacation as to all, 42 ALR2d 1030.

Power of court to vacate or modify order granting new trial in civil case, 61 ALR2d 642.

Appealability of void judgment or of one granting or denying motion for vacation thereof, 81 ALR2d 537.

Right to jury trial on motion to vacate judgment, 75 ALR3d 894.

Amendment of record of judgment in state civil case to correct judicial errors and omissions, 50 ALR5th 653.

Circumstances in which indefinite stay of proceedings in federal civil case constitutes abuse of discretion or is otherwise unlawful, 150 ALR Fed 577.

49 C.J.S. Judgments §§ 228 to 340.

§ 1-16-401.
Authority of court; grounds.

A district court may vacate or modify its own judgment or order after the term at which it was made:

By granting a new trial when the grounds for a new trial could not with reasonable diligence have been discovered before, but are discovered after the original motion for a new trial has been passed upon by the district court;

By a new trial granted in proceedings against defendants constructively summoned;

For mistake, neglect or omission of the clerk or irregularity in obtaining a judgment or order;

For fraud practiced by the successful party in obtaining a judgment or order;

For erroneous proceedings against a minor or person of unsound mind, when the condition of the defendant does not appear in the record nor the error in the proceedings;

For the death of the parties before judgment in the action;

For unavoidable casualty or misfortune preventing the party from prosecuting or defending;

For errors in a judgment shown by a minor within twelve (12) months after arriving at the age of majority;

For taking judgments upon warrants of attorney for more than was due the plaintiff, when the defendant was not summoned or otherwise legally notified of the time and place of taking the judgment;

When the judgment or order was obtained in whole or in a material part by false testimony on the part of the successful party or any witness in his behalf which ordinary prudence could not have anticipated or guarded against and the guilty party has been convicted.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 361; R.S. 1887, § 2701; R.S. 1899, § 3795; C.S. 1910, § 4650; C.S. 1920, § 5923; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 93; R.S. 1931, § 89-2301; C.S. 1945, § 3-3801; W.S. 1957, § 1-325; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 4; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-401

.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Authority to correct judgments. —

The legislature may authorize courts to correct their judgments after the term at which they were rendered. Midwest Ref. Co. v. George, 44 Wyo. 25, 7 P.2d 213,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1932).

Remedy applicable to interlocutory order. —

Judgment as recorded may be corrected if it does not speak the truth unless limitations or laches bar such relief, and remedy is not limited to judgments only, but applies equally to interlocutory order sustaining demurrer (now motion). Bales v. Brome, 56 Wyo. 111, 105 P.2d 568,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1940).

Nature of proceedings. —

Proceeding to vacate judgment is not a civil action, but special proceedings in action after judgment. Luman v. Hill, 36 Wyo. 48, 252 P. 1019,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 36 Wyo. 427, 256 P. 339,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1927).

No conflict. —

This section does not conflict with Wyo. R. Civ. P. 60 insofar as a party seeks modification of a divorce judgment. Bradley v. Bradley, 2005 WY 107, 118 P.3d 984,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2005).

Correction of error by appeal or modification. —

Where decree establishing water rights was not void on its face and was rendered after jurisdiction of parties and subject matter had been secured, error in award of water to defendant city, if any, could be corrected only by appeal within two years or by proceeding to modify under this section, within three years. Holt v. Cheyenne, 22 Wyo. 212, 137 P. 876,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1914).

District court had jurisdiction to modify divorce decree by ordering defendant to replace value of savings bonds belonging to children, where both parties to divorce agreed that mistake was made in original decree when court ordered defendant to maintain savings bonds which did not then exist. Roseman v. Sackett, 979 P.2d 940,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1999).

Equitable jurisdiction to relief. —

District courts have equitable jurisdiction to grant relief from judgments in case of fraud, accident and mistake, without statutory authority. Midwest Ref. Co. v. George, 44 Wyo. 25, 7 P.2d 213,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1932).

Subsection (a)(iv) of this section, is merely cumulative and does not restrict power of courts having equitable powers to vacate judgments which have been obtained by fraud or perjury against which the unsuccessful party had no opportunity to defend. Harden v. Card, 17 Wyo. 210, 97 P. 1075,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1908).

District court, as court of equity, had power to annul decree after expiration of term at which it was rendered for fraud or imposition on the court, as provisions of this and other sections in this article are not exclusive. Rock Springs Coal & Mining Co. v. Black Diamond Coal Co., 39 Wyo. 379, 272 P. 12,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 1928).

District courts have jurisdiction over their judgments during term rendered.

McGinnis v. Beatty, 28 Wyo. 328, 204 P. 340,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1922).

Motion to vacate made during term. —

The power of the court to vacate a judgment for unavoidable casualty or misfortune preventing the party from prosecuting or defending should be exercised at least as liberally when the motion to vacate is made during the term as when it is made after the term, and probably more liberally. Lake v. Lake, 63 Wyo. 373, 63 Wyo. 375, 182 P.2d 824,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1947).

Judgment may be carried over term. —

Court did not err in granting contestee's motion to amend and modify judgment at next term after it was entered, as the motion was filed and notice given before the close of the term, and a judgment may be carried over the term by a motion to vacate or modify it, filed upon notice at the term at which it was rendered. Ramsay v. Gottsche, 51 Wyo. 516, 69 P.2d 535,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1937).

Motion properly made at succeeding term. —

Date of rendition of judgment held to be that of entry at term succeeding trial term, so that motion for vacation and judgment notwithstanding verdict was properly made at succeeding term. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

And not so made. —

Motion to vacate a judgment not made within three days after the successive term was held ineffective. Boulter v. Cook, 32 Wyo. 461, 234 P. 1101,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 32 Wyo. 461, 236 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1925).

Equitable power available to enter nunc pro tunc. —

The district court has power to enter a nunc pro tunc order, which order purports to correct a final decree of settlement of account and distribution in the matter of a decedent's estate, when the order is made some 28 years after entry of the final decree, since there is equitable power without reference to the statutes to grant relief from accident or mistake. In re Estate of Kimball, 583 P.2d 1274,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 232

(Wyo. 1978).

Venue. —

Where time to attack divorce judgment in county wherein judgment was rendered had not expired, action based on husband's alleged fraud through failure to award wife's property settlement or permanent alimony should be brought in county where divorce was obtained. Rush v. Rush, 58 Wyo. 406, 133 P.2d 366,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1943).

Where fraud charged by wife's petition filed in Hot Springs county district court was fraud not only upon wife but upon district court of Natrona county, petition was properly dismissed and wife remitted to her remedy in Natrona county court. Rush v. Rush, 58 Wyo. 406, 133 P.2d 366,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1943).

Diligence required. —

One seeking relief against judgment must show diligence. Kelley v. Eidam, 32 Wyo. 271, 231 P. 678,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1924).

Procedure for opening. —

Judgment can be opened only on filing of petition and issuance and service of summons, where motion is not based on irregularity. Boulter v. Cook, 32 Wyo. 461, 234 P. 1101,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 32 Wyo. 461, 236 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1925).

Summons must issue at commencement of action to vacate or modify a judgment. First Nat'l Bank v. Moorcroft Ranch Co., 5 Wyo. 50, 36 P. 821,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1894).

Jurisdictional defects. —

Plaintiffs having proceeded in trial court to set aside certain orders, such proceedings constituted an appearance which cured alleged jurisdictional defects. Kilpatrick v. Horton, 15 Wyo. 501, 89 P. 1035,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1907).

Insufficient petition dismissed. —

Court may dismiss for insufficiency petition in statutory proceeding to vacate judgment, though no demurrer (now motion to dismiss) is filed. Luman v. Hill, 36 Wyo. 48, 252 P. 1019,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1927), rehearing denied, 36 Wyo. 427, 256 P. 339,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(1927). See Rule 7, W.R.C.P.

Finding that petition did not state facts sufficient to warrant vacation of judgment is sufficient for the dismissal of the petition. Luman v. Hill, 36 Wyo. 48, 252 P. 1019,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 36 Wyo. 427, 256 P. 339,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1927).

Petition, alleging that fraud was practiced upon defendant by violation of alleged agreement to submit cause upon depositions and assessment schedules and upon an offer of defendant that judgment might be taken against him in certain sum, which did not allege that plaintiff accepted defendant's offer to confess judgment, did not state facts sufficient to warrant vacation of judgment. Luman v. Hill, 36 Wyo. 48, 252 P. 1019,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 36 Wyo. 427, 256 P. 339,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1927).

Motion to reinstate held insufficient. —

Under this section, a motion to reinstate case after dismissal for want of prosecution, considered as a petition, which alleges that by neglect of an attorney for plaintiff his amended petition was not filed within time allowed and that the papers in the case were mislaid for more than two years, without showing any effort to supply loss by copies or otherwise, was insufficient. Parrott v. District Court of Third Judicial Dist., 20 Wyo. 494, 126 P. 45,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1912).

Motion only considered motion to vacate, not petition. —

A motion designated as motion for new trial, which did not set forth the judgment nor state defense to the action except by reference to an answer tendered before judgment, and on which no summons was issued, could not be considered a petition, since it failed to comply substantially with statutory requirements, but could only be considered motion to vacate the judgment. Mitter v. Black Diamond Coal Co., 28 Wyo. 439, 206 P. 152,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1922), limited, Wyoming Automotive Co. v. Weisflog, 47 Wyo. 32, 30 P.2d 490,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1934).

Cause of action stated. —

In proceeding to vacate a judgment for fraud practiced by successful party, under this section and §§

1-16-404

and

1-16-405

, petition states good cause of action which alleges that attorney for plaintiff, in collusion with attorney for defendant, fraudulently let judgments go against plaintiff by consent, that judgment of another state, upon which former suit was founded, was fraudulently procured, that court of other state did not have jurisdiction of plaintiff and that prior to that suit judgment creditor had been enjoined by order of another court of same state from collecting notes placed in judgment, except as to his interest therein at time injunction suit was started. Bank of Chadron v. Anderson, 6 Wyo. 518, 48 P. 197,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1897).

Newly-discovered evidence. —

It is a strong case that will warrant a court of review in reversing the judgment of a trial fairly had on the ground of newly-discovered evidence. Hardendorf v. Gafner, 53 Wyo. 427, 84 P.2d 719,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1938).

Reasonable diligence in discovering new evidence, so that it can be properly and timely presented to the court, is necessary, and the burden is upon the appellants to show due diligence. The affidavits must contain more than mere conclusions. Hardendorf v. Gafner, 53 Wyo. 427, 84 P.2d 719,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1938).

Where service was had by publication,

parties having no knowledge may apply for and obtain leave to defend at any time within three years. Closson v. Closson, 30 Wyo. 1, 215 P. 485,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1923).

Second default judgment against defendant was properly set aside

on defendant's motion where it was entered by state court while appeal was pending in state supreme court after rendition of first default judgment and after staying proceedings by giving bond, state district court being then without jurisdiction. Montgomery v. Sioux City Seed Co., 71 F.2d 926, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 3249 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934).

Term “clerical error”

includes not only errors made by clerk in entering judgment, but also those mistakes apparent on the record, whether made by the court or counsel during progress of the case, which cannot reasonably be attributed to exercise of judicial consideration or discretion. In re Pringle's Estate, 51 Wyo. 352, 67 P.2d 204,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1937).

In proceeding to modify a decree, on ground of manifest clerical mistake by the court clerk, affecting certain water rights of the city of Cheyenne over 45 years after its entry, and when it was impossible to ascertain what facts were before the court, such proceedings, which had to be commenced within two years, were barred. Application of Beaver Dam Ditch Co., 54 Wyo. 459, 93 P.2d 934,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1939).

Motion to set aside judgment after term for irregularity

in obtaining judgment is proper, but will not be sustained unless court is satisfied that meritorious defense to action exists in favor of moving parties. Bank of Commerce v. Williams, 52 Wyo. 1, 69 P.2d 525,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1937).

Power of the court to set aside a judgment after the term under subsection (a)(iii) of this section is not for irregularity in the judgment, but for irregularity in obtaining it. Bank of Commerce v. Williams, 52 Wyo. 1, 69 P.2d 525,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1937).

Term “irregularity”

must be given a broad enough meaning to cover a case where the court has acted upon an erroneous understanding of the facts. In re Estate of Jansen, 76 Wyo. 430, 305 P.2d 422,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1957).

Applicability to probate matters. —

The provision of this section that the district court may modify its judgment after term for “irregularity” in obtaining a judgment or order is applicable in probate matters. In re Estate of Jansen, 76 Wyo. 430, 305 P.2d 422,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1957).

A final order of a probate court could be set aside after term due to “irregularity” in obtaining the final order where counsel for the estate failed to reveal to the court the fact that the validity of a prior order of the court in the proceeding was pending on appeal in the supreme court. In re Estate of Jansen, 76 Wyo. 430, 305 P.2d 422,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1957).

Wrong findings held not irregularities. —

Wrong findings of fact by trial court in ruling on a defaulting defendant's application for leave to appear and defend are not irregularities for which judgment can be vacated, since an irregularity is not a wrong adjudication, and is to be distinguished from error, but is want of adherence to some prescribed rule or method of proceeding. Mitter v. Black Diamond Coal Co., 28 Wyo. 439, 206 P. 152,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1922), limited, Wyoming Automotive Co. v. Weisflog, 47 Wyo. 32, 30 P.2d 490,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1934).

A wrong decision by district court on questions of fact, which it had power to hear and determine, would not be such an irregularity as would properly fall within subsection (a)(iii) of this section. Bank of Commerce v. Williams, 52 Wyo. 1, 69 P.2d 525,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1937).

Special findings on issue of fraud. —

In proceeding to vacate default judgment, refusal to make special findings on issue of fraud was not error where request was not made until order vacating judgment was had. Cottonwood Sheep Co. v. Murphy, 48 Wyo. 250, 44 P.2d 1000,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1935).

Prior death of party. —

Substantial compliance with statute is necessary to authorize vacation of judgment for prior death of party. Clarke v. Shoshoni Lumber Co., 31 Wyo. 205, 224 P. 845,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1924), writ of error dismissed, 276 U.S. 595, 48 S. Ct. 302, 72 L. Ed. 722, 1928 U.S. LEXIS 118 (U.S. 1928).

“Unavoidable casualty” not found. —

That defendant's attorney could not be present at trial on day judgment was rendered because of previous engagements, which kept him in court in another county, did not constitute “unavoidable casualty,” warranting vacation of judgment. Luman v. Hill, 36 Wyo. 48, 252 P. 1019,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 36 Wyo. 427, 256 P. 339,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1927).

Proceeds of homestead. —

Court could determine claim to proceeds of homestead after expiration of term at which sale was confirmed. Altman v. District Court of Second Judicial Dist., 36 Wyo. 290, 254 P. 691,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1927).

Modification necessarily requires consideration of applicant's defense.

Emery v. Emery, 404 P.2d 745,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1965).

Provisions applicable to judgments having some degree of validity.
—

Statutes pertaining to the modification and vacation of judgments after term are intended to apply to judgments having some degree of validity. Emery v. Emery, 404 P.2d 745,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1965).

Acts wholly in excess of court's jurisdiction are subject to attack

in any way and at any time the aggrieved party may see fit, by proper proceedings. Bank of Commerce v. Williams, 52 Wyo. 1, 69 P.2d 525,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1937).

Such as void judgments. —

A judgment which is wholly void is in legal effect a nullity, and there is nothing in this section which purports to, or which could, breathe validity into a judgment which is wholly void on account of being entered in the absence of jurisdiction over the defendant. Emery v. Emery, 404 P.2d 745,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1965).

Consequently, no showing of merits is necessary in support of application to have it vacated.

Emery v. Emery, 404 P.2d 745,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1965).

Relief proper. —

In a divorce case, a wife's due process rights under Wyo. Const. art. I, § 6 and the Fourteenth Amendment were violated when a district court entered a default divorce decree based on a supplemental pleading that was not served on the wife; a wife's motion to modify the decree should have been granted because the supplemental affidavit contained claims for relief that were not in the original complaint. Bradley v. Bradley, 2005 WY 107, 118 P.3d 984,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2005).

Writ of prohibition. —

Where the district court had jurisdiction to vacate a judgment, the supreme court will not issue a writ of prohibition. State ex rel. Bank of Chadron v. District Court, 5 Wyo. 227, 39 P. 749,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1895).

Order deemed final. —

An order entered on motion to vacate a judgment under this article is a final order from which appeal lies. Mitter v. Black Diamond Coal Co., 28 Wyo. 439, 206 P. 152,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1922), limited, Wyoming Automotive Co. v. Weisflog, 47 Wyo. 32, 30 P.2d 490,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1934).

Amendment of appeal record. —

After close of term at which judgment was rendered, appeal record can be amended only upon minutes or memoranda in possession of court or judge. State Use of Frederick v. Allen, 42 Wyo. 51, 288 P. 1058,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1930).

Marital property division modifiable where particular debt
omitted from original decree. —

The parties to a divorce action stipulated that a particular debt was omitted from the original decree. They also agreed that the district court should make a disposition of the debt. Under such circumstances, the court did not abuse its discretion when it modified the judgment containing the division of marital property. Barnett v. Barnett, 704 P.2d 1308,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 534

(Wyo. 1985).

Rule 60(b), W.R.C.P., does not limit power of court to entertain independent action

to relieve a party from a judgment, order, or proceeding as provided in this section and §

1-16-408

or to grant relief to a party against whom a judgment or order has been rendered without other service than by publication, as provided in §

1-16-402

.Gifford v. Casper Neon Sign Co., 618 P.2d 547,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1980).

Applied

in

Paul v. Paul, 631 P.2d 1060,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 364

(Wyo. 1981); Harshfield v. Harshfield, 842 P.2d 535,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

State v. Bentine, 66 Wyo. 222, 208 P.2d 291,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1949); Jubie v. Dahlke (In re Estate of Dahlke),

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Feb 25, 2014).

Stated

in

Eager v. Derowitsch, 68 Wyo. 251, 232 P.2d 713,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(1951); Henderson v. Sky, 71 Wyo. 250, 256 P.2d 106,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1953); Barrett v. Town of Guernsey, 652 P.2d 395,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 390

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Hendrickson v. Bradley, 85 F. 508,

1898 U.S. App. LEXIS 2186

(8th Cir. 1898); Kinney v. Owens, 15 Wyo. 387, 89 P. 573,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1907); Kinney v. Owens, 15 Wyo. 394, 89 P. 574,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1907); Spencer v. Loewenstein, 29 Wyo. 31, 207 P. 1098,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1922); Clarke v. Shoshoni Lumber Co., 31 Wyo. 205, 224 P. 845,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1924); In re Estate of Brennan, 433 P.2d 512,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 1967); In re Estate of Sullivan, 506 P.2d 813,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1973); R.C.R., Inc. v. Rainbow Canyon, Inc., 978 P.2d 581,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Mechanically Produced Evidence,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 221.

See, “Due Diligence Required for Service by Publication,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 70.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Vacation of judgment based on unauthorized compromise by attorney, 30 ALR2d 944.

Right of successful party to have judgment in his favor vacated or set aside on grounds of mistake, inadvertence, excusable neglect or the like, 40 ALR2d 1127.

Lack of authority of attorney to dismiss or otherwise terminate action as ground for relief from judgment, 56 ALR2d 1290.

Attack, by petition to set aside judgment, on personal service as having been obtained by fraud or trickery, 98 ALR2d 551.

Consent as ground of vacating judgment, or granting new trial, in civil case, after expiration of term or time prescribed by statute or rules of court, 3 ALR3d 1191.

Opening default or default judgment claimed to have been obtained because of attorney's mistake as to time or place of appearance, trial, or filing of necessary papers, 21 ALR3d 1255.

Liability insurer's right to open or set aside or contest matters relating to merits of judgment against insured entered in action in which insurer did not appear or defend, 27 ALR3d 350.

Inattention of juror from sleepiness or other cause as ground for reversal or new trial, 59 ALR5th 1.

Waiver of right to default judgment, 64 ALR5th 163.

§ 1-16-402.
Opening judgment or order rendered on service by publication.

A party against whom
a judgment or order has been rendered without service other than by
publication in a newspaper may have the same opened and be allowed
to defend within six (6) months after the date of the judgment or
order. Before the judgment or order can be opened, the applicant shall
give notice to the adverse party of his intended application, file
a full answer to the petition, pay all costs if the court requires
them to be paid and make it appear to the satisfaction of the court
that during the pendency of the action he had no actual notice thereof
in time to appear in court and make his defense. Each party may present
affidavits.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 362; R.S. 1887, § 2702; R.S. 1899, § 3796; C.S. 1910, § 4651; C.S. 1920, § 5924; R.S. 1931, § 89-2302; C.S. 1945, § 3-3802; Laws 1947, ch. 55, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-326; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-402

.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notice, see §§

1-6-201

to

1-6-204

.

As to service by publication, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

Proving lack of notice. —

One moving to open default for want of personal service must prove no actual notice in time to defend. Clarke v. Shoshoni Lumber Co., 31 Wyo. 205, 224 P. 845,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1924), writ of error dismissed, 276 U.S. 595, 48 S. Ct. 302, 72 L. Ed. 722, 1928 U.S. LEXIS 118 (U.S. 1928).

Rule 60(b), W.R.C.P., does not limit power of court to entertain independent action

to relieve a party from a judgment, order, or proceeding, as provided in §§

1-16-401

and

1-16-408

, or to grant relief to a party against whom a judgment or order has been rendered without other service than by publication, as provided in this section. Gifford v. Casper Neon Sign Co., 618 P.2d 547,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1980).

Quoted

in

Barrett v. Town of Guernsey, 652 P.2d 395,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 390

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Closson v. Closson, 30 Wyo. 1, 215 P. 485,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 30

, 29 A.L.R. 1371 (1923); Rock Springs Coal & Mining Co. v. Black Diamond Coal Co., 39 Wyo. 379, 272 P. 12,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(1928); In re Bergman, 60 Wyo. 355, 151 P.2d 360,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1944); Travis v. Estate of Travis, 79 Wyo. 329, 334 P.2d 508,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1959).

Law reviews. —

See “Administrative Problems Relating to Adoption,” 8 Wyo. L.J. 210.

§ 1-16-403.
Bona fide purchasers unaffected.

The title to any property
which is the subject of the judgment or order sought to be opened
and which in consequence of the judgment or order has passed to a
purchaser in good faith, shall not be affected by any proceedings
to vacate or modify the judgment, nor shall title to any property
sold before judgment under an attachment be affected by the proceedings.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 363; R.S. 1887, § 2703; R.S. 1899, § 3797; C.S. 1910, § 4652; C.S. 1920, § 5925; R.S. 1931, § 89-2303; C.S. 1945, § 3-3803; W.S. 1957, § 1-327; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-403

.

Cited

in

Rock Springs Coal & Mining Co. v. Black Diamond Coal Co., 39 Wyo. 379, 272 P. 12,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(1928).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Execution sale as affected by modification of judgment, 32 ALR3d 1019.

§ 1-16-404.
Grounds to vacate tried first.

The court must first
try and decide whether to vacate or modify a judgment or order before
trying or deciding the validity of the defense or cause of action.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 366; R.S. 1887, § 2706; R.S. 1899, § 3800; C.S. 1910, § 4655; C.S. 1920, § 5928; R.S. 1931, § 89-2306; C.S. 1945, § 3-3806; W.S. 1957, § 1-329; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-17-404.

Meritorious defense to exist. —

Motion to set aside judgment after term for irregularity in obtaining judgment is proper, but will not be sustained unless court is satisfied that meritorious defense to action exists in favor of moving parties. Bank of Commerce v. Williams, 52 Wyo. 1, 69 P.2d 525,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1937).

Refusal to make special findings. —

In proceedings to vacate default judgment, refusal to make special findings on issue of fraud was not error where request was not made until order vacating judgment was had. Cottonwood Sheep Co. v. Murphy, 48 Wyo. 250, 44 P.2d 1000,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1935).

Cited

in

Bank of Chadron v. Anderson, 6 Wyo. 518, 48 P. 197,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1897); Kilpatrick v. Horton, 15 Wyo. 501, 89 P. 1035,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1907); Rock Springs Coal & Mining Co. v. Black Diamond Coal Co., 39 Wyo. 379, 272 P. 12,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(1928).

§ 1-16-405.
Proceedings prior to vacation and upon modification.

A judgment shall not
be vacated until it is decided that there is a valid defense to the
action in which the judgment was rendered or if the plaintiff seeks
its vacation, that there is a valid cause of action. When a judgment
is modified, all liens and securities obtained under it shall be preserved
to the modified judgment.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 367; R.S. 1887, § 2707; R.S. 1899, § 3801; C.S. 1910, § 4656; C.S. 1920, § 5929; R.S. 1931, § 89-2307; C.S. 1945, § 3-3807; W.S. 1957, § 1-330; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-405

.

Section does not limit power of court

to control its own judgments during term at which they are rendered. McGinnis v. Beatty, 28 Wyo. 328, 204 P. 340,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1922).

Intention of section

is that a judgment should not be opened, if it would be useless to do so. Bales v. Brome, 56 Wyo. 111, 105 P.2d 568,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1940).

Nature of proceeding. —

Proceeding to vacate a judgment is not a civil action, but a special proceeding in an action after judgment, in view of provisions defining a final order. Luman v. Hill, 36 Wyo. 427, 256 P. 339,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1927).

Meritorious defense to exist. —

Motion to set aside judgment after term for irregularity in obtaining judgment is proper, but will not be sustained unless court is satisfied that meritorious defense to action exists in favor of moving parties. Bank of Commerce v. Williams, 52 Wyo. 1, 69 P.2d 525,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1937).

But not where judgment void. —

Defendant against whom default judgment on note was entered by district court clerk was entitled to have judgment opened at subsequent term without showing meritorious defense where judgment was void for inclusion of reasonable attorney's fee. Wunnicke v. Leith, 61 Wyo. 191, 157 P.2d 274,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1945).

Justice requires void default judgment on note be reopened at subsequent term, even though it be necessary to show meritorious defense, where petition showed that note had been at least partially paid, so that right of matter might be accurately determined. Wunnicke v. Leith, 61 Wyo. 191, 157 P.2d 274,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1945).

Adjudication to be had on merits. —

Under this section for vacation of judgment, issue must be joined and an adjudication had on the merits of the defense to the action. James v. Lederer-Strauss & Co., 32 Wyo. 377, 233 P. 137,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1925).

Cause of action held stated. —

Plaintiff, after dismissal of action ordered, seeking to correct order sustaining demurrer (now motion to dismiss) on ground of misjoinder of parties, to correspond to facts, is not required to show petition stated cause of action, since court, in refusing to sustain demurrer (now motion to dismiss) on ground that it failed to state cause of action, impliedly held it stated such cause. Bales v. Brome, 56 Wyo. 111, 105 P.2d 568,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1940). See Rule 7, W.R.C.P.

Special findings of fraud. —

In proceedings to vacate default judgment, refusal to make special findings on issue of fraud was not error where request was not made until order vacating judgment was had. Cottonwood Sheep Co. v. Murphy, 48 Wyo. 250, 44 P.2d 1000,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1935).

Cited

in

Bank of Chadron v. Anderson, 6 Wyo. 518, 48 P. 197,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1897); Rock Springs Coal & Mining Co. v. Black Diamond Coal Co., 39 Wyo. 379, 272 P. 12,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(1928); Kilpatrick v. Horton, 15 Wyo. 501, 89 P. 1035,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1907).

§ 1-16-406.
Injunction; suspension of judgment or order.

The party seeking to
vacate or modify a judgment or order may obtain an injunction suspending
proceedings on the whole or a part thereof when it appears probable
by affidavit or by exhibition of the record that the party is entitled
to have the judgment or order vacated or modified.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 368; R.S. 1887, § 2708; R.S. 1899, § 3802; C.S. 1910, § 4657; C.S. 1920, § 5930; R.S. 1931, § 89-2308; C.S. 1945, § 3-3808; W.S. 1957, § 1-331; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-406

.

Cross references. —

As to injunction pending appeal taken from judgment or final order, see Rule 62, W.R.C.P.

Cited

in

Rock Springs Coal & Mining Co. v. Black Diamond Coal Co., 39 Wyo. 379, 272 P. 12,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(1928).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of trial court to enjoin enforcement of its judgment as affected by previous affirmance, 85 ALR2d 772.

§ 1-16-407.
Injunction; suspension of premature judgment.

If the judgment was rendered
before the action stood for trial, the injunction may be granted although
no valid defense to the action is shown. The court shall make such
orders concerning the executions on the judgment as shall give to
the defendant the same rights of delay he would have had if the judgment
had been rendered at the proper time.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 369; R.S. 1887, § 2709; R.S. 1899, § 3803; C.S. 1910, § 4658; C.S. 1920, § 5931; R.S. 1931, § 89-2309; C.S. 1945, § 3-3809; W.S. 1957, § 1-332; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-17-407.

Cited

in

Rock Springs Coal & Mining Co. v. Black Diamond Coal Co., 39 Wyo. 379, 272 P. 12,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(1928).

§ 1-16-408.
Limitation on time for proceedings.

Proceedings to vacate
or modify a judgment or order, for the causes mentioned in W.S. 1-16-401(a)(iv), (v) and (vii) must be commenced within two (2) years
after the judgment was rendered or order made, unless the party entitled
thereto is a minor or a person of unsound mind, and in cases of such
disability, within two (2) years after the removal thereof. Proceedings
for the causes mentioned in W.S. 1-16-401(a)(iii) and (vi) shall be commenced within three (3) years, and
in W.S. 1-16-401(a)(ix) within two (2) years, after the defendant has notice
of the judgment. Proceedings for the causes mentioned in W.S. 1-16-401(a)(x) may be commenced after the guilty party is convicted,
if the conviction is within two (2) years from the rendition of the
judgment.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 370; R.S. 1887, § 2710; R.S. 1899, § 3804; C.S. 1910, § 4659; C.S. 1920, § 5932; R.S. 1931, § 89-2310; C.S. 1945, § 3-3810; W.S. 1957, § 1-333; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-17-408.

Cross references. —

As to limitation of actions generally, see chapter 3 of this title.

Authority to correct judgments. —

Legislature may authorize courts to correct their judgments after the term at which they were rendered. Midwest Ref. Co. v. George, 44 Wyo. 25, 7 P.2d 213,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1932).

Meritorious defense to exist. —

Motion to set aside judgment after term for irregularity in obtaining judgment is proper, but will not be sustained unless court is satisfied that meritorious defense to action exists in favor of moving parties. Bank of Commerce v. Williams, 52 Wyo. 1, 69 P.2d 525,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1937).

Right to modify lost. —

If no proceedings are taken within the time specified for correcting a judgment, right to modify is lost. Holt v. Cheyenne, 22 Wyo. 212, 137 P. 876,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1914).

Proceeding barred. —

In proceeding to modify decree, on the ground of a manifest clerical mistake by the clerk of the court, affecting certain water rights of the city of Cheyenne, over 45 years, after its entry, and when it was impossible to ascertain what facts were before the court, such proceeding, which must be commenced within two years, is barred. Application of Beaver Dam Ditch Co., 54 Wyo. 459, 93 P.2d 934,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1939).

Equitable jurisdiction to grant relief. —

District courts have equitable jurisdiction to grant relief from judgments in case of fraud, accident and mistake, without statutory authority. Midwest Ref. Co. v. George, 44 Wyo. 25, 7 P.2d 213,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1932).

Equitable power to enter nunc pro tunc. —

The district court has power to enter a nunc pro tunc order, which order purports to correct a final decree of settlement of account and distribution in the matter of a decedent's estate, when the order is made some 28 years after entry of the final decree since there is equitable power without reference to the statutes to grant relief from accident or mistake. In re Estate of Kimball, 583 P.2d 1274,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 232

(Wyo. 1978).

Vacation not demanded by equity. —

Vacation on motion filed more than eight years after action was commenced was not demanded by impelling equity. Clarke v. Shoshoni Lumber Co., 31 Wyo. 205, 224 P. 845,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1924), writ of error dismissed, 276 U.S. 595, 48 S. Ct. 302, 72 L. Ed. 722, 1928 U.S. LEXIS 118 (U.S. 1928).

Where time to attack divorce judgment in county where granted had not expired,

action based on husband's fraud in connection with failure to award property settlement or permanent alimony should be brought in county where divorce judgment was obtained. Rush v. Rush, 58 Wyo. 406, 133 P.2d 366,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1943).

Rule 60(b), W.R.C.P., does not limit power of court to entertain independent action

to relieve a party from a judgment, order, or proceeding, as provided in §

1-16-401

and this section, or to grant relief to a party against whom a judgment or order has been rendered without other service than by publication, as provided in §

1-16-402

.Gifford v. Casper Neon Sign Co., 618 P.2d 547,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1980).

Applied

in

Roseman v. Sackett, 979 P.2d 940,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1999).

Cited

in

Rock Springs Coal & Mining Co. v. Black Diamond Coal Co., 39 Wyo. 379, 272 P. 12,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(1928); In re Estate of Sullivan, 506 P.2d 813,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1973).

Stated

in

Jubie v. Dahlke (In re Estate of Dahlke),

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Feb 25, 2014).

Law reviews. —

See “Due Diligence Required for Service by Publication,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 70.